West Virginia, session 2026, SB385.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 10. Authorization for Department of commerce to promulgate legislative rules. §64- 10 - 1. Division of Rehabilitation Services. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on March 31, 2025, authorized under the authority of §18-10L-6 of this code, relating to the Rehabilitation Services (Ron Yost Personal Assistance Services Act Board, 198 CSR 01), is authorized.